A deep-seated secret serf like all of them! 'Sviyazhsky said.'
'Whose are you the leader...'
'Yes, only I lead them the other way,' said Sviyazhsky, laughing.
'I am very busy with this,' said Levin. 'He's right that it's our business, i.e. rational economy, 'that it's just a meadow farm like this quiet one, or the simplest one.'
Whose fault is that?
'Of course we do. And then it's not true it's gonna go down.
Vasilčikov's got it.
'The plant...
'But I still don't know what surprises you.
The people are in such a low degree of material and moral development that they obviously must resist anything that is alien to them.
In Europe, the rational economy is going on because the people are educated; so we have to form a people -- that's all.
'But how can we form a people?'
'It takes three things to form a people: schools, schools, and schools.
'But you yourself said that the people are at a low level of material development. What can schools do?
'You know, you remind me of a joke about advice to a sick person: 'You'd like to try a laxative.' &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt;i&gt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt;i&gt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &gt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &lt; &lt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &lt; &gt; &lt; &gt; &lt; &lt; &gt; &lt; &lt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt -- "Try leech." - &quot; Tried: Worse &quot;. - "Well, pray to God." - &quot; Tried: Worse &quot;.
So are we.
I say political economy, you say it's worse.
I say socialism -- worse.
Education is worse.
'What will schools do?'
'They will give him other needs.'
'This is what I never understood,' said Levin with a hotness. 'How will schools help the people to improve their wealth?
You say, schools, education will give him new needs.
All the worse, because he won't be able to satisfy them.
And how knowing the addition and subtraction and catechism would help him to improve his material condition, I could never understand.
I met a woman with a baby three nights later and asked her where she was going.
She says, "I went to my grandma's house, the krix boy was attacked, the way I treated him."
I asked how a grandma treats a cricket.
"The baby sits on chickens and sentences something."
'Well, you say it yourself!
So that she wouldn't wear a cricket to eat, it would take...' said Sviyazhsky with a laughing smile.
'Oh, no! 'Absolutely Levin said,' said he, 'it is only a treatment for me like the treatment of the people by schools.
The people are poor and uneducated -- we see it as right as a woman sees a scream because a child screams.
But why this scourge -- poverty and lack of education -- will help schools, just as it is not clear why screaming will help chickens to spread.
We need to help what he's poor from.
'Well, at least that's where you come together with Spencer, whom you don't like so much; he also says that education can be a consequence of greater well-being and convenience of life, frequent washing, as he says, but not reading and counting...'
'Well, I'm very happy or, on the contrary, very not happy that I got involved with Spencer; that's what I've known for a long time.
Schools will not help, but they will benefit from an economic arrangement in which the people are richer, more leisure, and then there will be schools.
'But all over Europe, schools are now compulsory.
'What about you, do you agree with Spencer? 'I asked Levin.'
But in the eyes of Sviyazh, the expression of fear came to light, and he smiled and said,
'No, this crixus is excellent!
Did you hear it?
Levin saw that he would never find a connection between this man's life and his thoughts.
Apparently, he didn't care what his reasoning would lead him to; he only needed a process of reasoning. And he was uncomfortable when the reasoning process turned him into a stupid alley.
He was the only one who didn't like it and avoided it by turning the conversation into something nice and fun.
All the impressions of this day, starting with the impression of a man on half the road, which served as the basic basis of all the current experiences and thoughts, were very exciting to Levin.
This sweet Sviyazhsky, who keeps his thoughts to himself only for public consumption and apparently has some other secret for Levin, the basis of life, and yet he is with a crowd whose name is the legion leading public opinion to alien thoughts; this angry mongrel, who is absolutely right in his reasoning, tortured by life, but wronged by his anger to the whole class and the best class of Russia; his own displeasure with his activities and the vague hope of finding an amendment to all of this, all merged into a sense of internal anxiety and expectation of close resolution.
When he remained in the room, lying on a spring turf, which was suddenly thrown at every move of his arm and leg, Levin remained awake for a long time.
No conversation with Sviyazhsky, even though many clever things had been said to him, was of no interest to Levin; but the landowner's arguments required discussion.
Levin was unwilling to remember all his words and to correct in his imagination that he had answered him.
"Yeah, I should have told him: you're saying that our farm is going off because the man hates all the improvements and that they have to be driven by power; but if the economy wasn't going at all without these improvements, you'd be right; but it's going, and it only goes where the worker works according to his habits, like an old man's half way.
Yours and our common displeasure proves that we or the workers are to blame.
We've been crumbling in our own way for a long time, in European terms, without asking about the characteristics of the workforce.
Let's try to recognize the labor force not as the perfect labour force, but as the Russian man with his instincts, and we'll do the same.
Imagine -- I should have told him -- that you have a farm like an old man, that you have found a way to interest the workers in the success of the work and that you have found the same middle in the improvements that they recognize -- and you, without exhausting the soil, will get double, triple against the previous one.
Split in half, give half the labor force; the difference you will have will be greater, and the labour will be greater.
And to do that, you have to lower the level of the farm and get the workers interested in the success of the farm.
How to do that is a matter of detail, but it is certainly possible.
This thought led Levin to great excitement.
He didn't sleep half the night thinking about details for execution.
He wasn't going to leave the other day, but now he thinks he's going home early in the morning.
In addition, this sister - in - law with a cut in her dress made him feel the same as shame and remorse for a bad act.
Above all, he had to go without delay: he had to offer the men a new project before the winter was planted in order to sow it on new grounds.
He's decided to turn over the old farm.
The execution of Levin's plan presented many challenges; however, he fought as hard as he could and achieved what he did not want, but that he could, without deceiving himself, believe that it was worth the work.
One of the main difficulties was that the farm was already on the way, that it was impossible to stop everything and start over, and it was necessary to get the car back on track.
When he told the orderer his plans the same night he got home, the orderman was pleased to agree with that part of the speech that showed that everything that was being done so far was nonsense and unprofitable.
The orderman said he'd said it a long time ago, but they didn't want to hear it.
What happened before Levin &apos; s offer -- to take part, as a farmer, along with the workers in the whole business, only expressed great sadness and no definite opinion, and immediately spoke of the need to bring the rest of the rusts tomorrow and send two, so Levin felt that it was now not before.
By talking to the men about the same thing and offering them land under new conditions, he also faced the main difficulty of being so busy with the day's work that they had no time to think about the benefits and disadvantages of the enterprise.
The naive man Ivan the snatcher seemed to understand Levin &apos; s offer -- to share the benefits of the cattleyard with his family -- and was quite sympathetic to this enterprise. But when Levin revealed to him future benefits, Ivan's face expressed anxiety and regret that he could not hear the whole thing, and he rushed to find some urgent work: either to pick up the forks by pouring hay out of the daylight, or to pour water, or to clean up the manure.
Another difficulty was the invincible mistrust of the peasants so that the target of the landowner could be something other than the desire to dislodge them as much as possible.
They firmly believed that the real purpose of his (what he told them) would always be what he would not tell them.
And they themselves spoke much, but never said what their real purpose was.
In addition (Levin felt that the galloper was right), the peasants were the first and permanent condition of any agreement to ensure that they were not forced into any new practices and use of new tools.
They agreed that the plow was better, that the quarry worked better, but they found thousands of reasons why they could not use either, and although he was convinced that he needed to lower the level of the farm, he felt sorry for the improvements, the benefits of which were so obvious.
But in spite of all these difficulties, he got his way, and by the fall it went, or at least it seemed to him.
At first Levin thought of giving up the whole farm, as it was, to men, workers, and orderors under new comrades' conditions, but very soon he became convinced that it was impossible, and decided to divide the farm.
The cattle yard, gardens, gardens, mowers, fields divided into several divisions were to produce separate articles.
Naïve Ivan, the best of all, seemed to Levin, who understood the case by picking up an artifact, mostly from his family, became a member of the cattleyard.
An eight-year-old field was taken with the help of a smart carpenter, Fedor Rezunov, by six men's families on new social grounds, and Shuraev's man took off all the gardens on the same conditions.
The rest was still the same, but these three articles were the beginning of the new device and were well occupied by Levin.
It is true that the livestock yard was still as bad as it was before, and Ivan was strongly opposed to the warm management of cows and cream oil, arguing that the cow would need less food in the cold and that butter would be more sparring, and he demanded a salary, as in the old days, and was not interested in the fact that the money he received was not a wage, but to give up a share of the junk.
It is true that Fedor Resunov's company did not move under the ploughs, as was agreed, to justify the short time.
It is true that the men of this company, although they agreed to conduct this case on new grounds, called this land not common, but common, and not once both the men of this art and Resunov themselves said to Levin: "We would get money for the land, and you would die and we would be set free."
In addition, these men have put aside, under various pretexts, the construction of cattle and rigas on this land and have been delayed until winter.
It's true that Shuraev's gardens were taken from him and he wanted to give them to the men. He evidently had a completely wrong and seemed deliberately wrong to understand the conditions under which the land had been given to him.
True, often speaking to men and explaining to them all the benefits of the business, Levin felt that men listened only to his voice and knew firmly that whatever he said, they would not deceive him.
In particular, he felt it when he spoke. With the smartest of men, Resunov, and noticed that game in Resunov's eyes, which clearly showed the ridicule of Levin and the firm belief that if anyone was cheated, it wasn't him, Resunov.
Yet, despite all this, Levin thought that the matter was going on and that, by strictly keeping score and insisting on his own, he would prove to them in the future the benefits of such a device and that the matter would then proceed on its own.
These things, along with the rest of the household left in his hands, along with the work of the office on his book, occupied Levin's summer so much that he hardly ever went hunting.
He learned at the end of August that the Oblons had left for Moscow, from the man who had brought the saddle back.
He felt that, by failing to respond to the letter of Daria Alexandrovna, his rudeness, about which he could not remember without the paint of shame, he had burned his ships and would never go to them.
Just as he did with Sviyazhsky, he left without saying goodbye.
But he's never gonna go to them either.
He didn't care anymore.
The work of the new structure of his household has occupied him in a way that has never been the case in his life.
He reread the books given to him by Sviyazhsky and, after writing what he did not have, reread the political, economic and socialist books on the subject and, as he expected, found nothing to do with what he had done.
In political and economic books, in Mille, for example, which he studied first with great heat, hoping to find a solution to his questions, he found laws that had been removed from the European economy; but he did not see why those laws, which were not applicable to Russia, should be common.
He also saw the same in socialist books: either these were great fantasies, but the unapplicable ones he was attracted to while he was still a student -- or amendments to fix the situation in which Europe was set up and with which the farming business in Russia had nothing to do with it.
Political economy said that the laws that developed and developed Europe's wealth were universal and unmistakable.
Socialist teaching has said that development under these laws leads to destruction.
Neither gave only an answer, but not the slightest hint of what he, Levin, and all Russian men and landowners, would do with their millions of hands and tithes to make them the most productive for the general welfare.
Once he had taken up the case, he had read in good faith everything relating to his subject and intended to travel abroad in the autumn to examine the case on the ground so that it would no longer happen to him on the subject of what had so often happened to him on various issues.
As soon as he began to understand the person's thoughts, he would say, "And Kaufman and John and Dubois and Micheli?
You didn't read them.
Read it; they have elaborated it."
He now saw clearly that Kaufman and Micheli had nothing to say to him.
He knew what he wanted.
He saw that Russia has beautiful lands, beautiful workers, and that in some cases, like a man on half the road, workers and land produce many, but in most cases, when European capital is invested, they produce little, and that it is only an exclamation, that workers want to work and work well by themselves, and that this opposition is not accidental, but permanent, founded in the spirit of the people.
He thought that the Russian people, who had been called upon to plant and process vast unoccupied areas, consciously, until all the lands were occupied, held up the necessary techniques for that, and that those techniques were not as bad as they normally thought.
And he wanted to prove it theoretically in a book and in practice in his own household.
At the end of September, the woods for the construction of the yard were removed on the ground and the oil from the carpets was sold and the young lady was separated.
In practice, the farm was doing well, or at least that's what Levin thought.
In order to explain the whole case in theory and finish the essay, which, according to Levin &apos; s dreams, had to not only make a coup in political economy, but completely destroy that science and begin a new science -- about the people &apos; s relationship to the ground -- it was only necessary to go abroad and examine on the ground everything that had been done in that direction, and to find convincing evidence that all that was done there was not what was needed.
Levin was only waiting for wheat supplies to get money and travel abroad.
But the rains did not allow the remaining bread and potatoes to be removed and stopped all the work and even the supply of wheat.
There was mud on the roads; two mills were flooded, and the weather was getting worse and worse.
On 30 September, the sun appeared early in the morning, and in hope of the weather, Levin was determined to prepare for his departure.
He told me to fill the wheat, sent an orderman to the merchant. To get the money, and I went to the house to make the last orders before I left.
After reworking, however, all the cases that were wet from the streams, which were covered by the skin behind his neck and behind his tibia, but in the brightest and most arousing state of spirit, Levin returned to his home by the evening.
It was even worse by the evening, and the croup was so painful that all the wet, shaking ears and head of the horse that it was walking side by side; but Levin was well under the bastard, and he was having fun looking around him at the murky creeks running on the wheels, the drops hanging on every skinny bitch, the white spot of the unbroken crutch on the bridge boards, the juicy, still fleshy leaf of the knitting that fell on the thick layer around the undressed tree.
Despite the grim nature of the environment, he felt particularly excited.
Talking to men in a far village showed that they were getting used to their relationship.
He apparently approved of Levin's plan and offered to join the animal-buying partnership.
"All I have to do is work hard, and I will do my job," Levin thought, "and working and working is what makes it.
This case isn't my own, it's about the common good.
The whole economy, most important, the situation of the entire people, must change completely. Instead of poverty, shared wealth, satisfaction; rather than hostility, harmony and the bond of interests.
In short, the revolution is bloodless, but the greatest revolution, first in the small circle of our county, then the province, Russia, the whole world. Because the thought of fairness cannot but be fruitful.
Yeah, that's the goal that makes it worth working.
And that it's me, Kostya Levin, the one... who came to the ball with a black tie and who was denied by Scherbatsky and who's so pathetic and pathetic to himself, that doesn't prove anything.
I'm sure Franklin felt just as worthless and didn't trust himself, remembering everything.
It doesn't mean anything.
And he had his own Agatha Michailovna, whom he believed in his plans."
In such thoughts Levin had already come to his house in the dark.
The orderman who was on his way to the merchant came and brought some of the money for the wheat.
The condition with the janitor was made, and on the way the orderman learned that the bread was standing in the field everywhere, so that the unscathed ones of their one hundred and sixty copens were nothing compared to what the others had.
After having lunch, Levin sat down, as usual, with a book in his chair and, while reading, kept thinking about his coming trip in connection with the book.
Today, he became particularly aware of the importance of his work, and he himself developed entire periods of his mind that express the essence of his thoughts.
"It has to be written down," he thought. 'This should be a brief introduction, which I had previously considered unnecessary.'
He stood up to go to the desk, and Laska, lying at his feet, pulled up, too, and looked back at him, as if asking where to go.
But there was no time to write down, because the chiefs came together, and Levin went out to them in the front.
After the outfit, that is, the instructions for tomorrow's work, and the reception of all the men before him, Levin went into the office and sat down to work.
Laska lay under the table; Agatha Mikhaylovna, with a stocking, sat in her seat.
After writing a few times, Levin suddenly remembered Kitty with extraordinary life, her refusal, and her last meeting.
He got up and started walking around the room.
'There is nothing to miss,' said Agatha Mikhaylovna. 'Well, why are you sitting at home?
We'd go to the warm waters, we'd all be happy.
'I'm on my way the day after tomorrow, Agatha Mikhaylovna. Let's get this over with.
'Well, what's your business!
How few men have you rewarded?
And they say, "Your lord will receive mercy from the king."
What do you care about men?
'I don't care about them, I do for myself.
Agatha Mikhaylovna knew all the details of Levin's business plans.
Levin often expressed his thoughts with all the fine things and often argued with her and disagreed with her explanations.
But now she's totally different about what he said to her.
'Your soul, a well-known case, needs the most thought,' she said with a sigh. 'Won Parmen Denisch, a gift that the illiterate man was, and so died, that God give to everyone,' she said about the recently-dead courthouse. 'We were, we were, we were.'
'I'm not talking about that,' he said. 'I say what I do for my own good.
It's better for me if men work better.
'Oh, no matter what you do, he's lazy, so it's gonna be through the stabbing of the deck.
If there's a conscience, it's working, and it's not -- you can't do anything.
'Yeah, because you say it yourself, Ivan is better to go after the cattle.'
'I say one thing,' replied Agatha Mikhaylovna, apparently not by accident, but with strict consistency of thought, 'you have to marry, that's what!
Agatha Michailovna's reference to the very thing he was just thinking about upset him and insulted him.
Levin frowned and sat down again for his work, repeating what he thought was important.
Sometimes he listened quietly to the sound of Agatha Mikhaylovna's beeps, and when he remembered something he didn't want to remember, he wrinkled again.
At nine o'clock, I heard a bell and a deaf swing of the body through the mud.
'Well, here come the guests, and it won't be boring,' said Agatha Mikhaylovna, standing up and heading for the door.
But Levin ran her over.
His work wasn't going on now, and he was happy with any guest...
When Levin ran up to half the stairs, he heard the sound of the piercing before him; but he heard it unclear because of the sound of his steps and hoped that he had made a mistake; then he saw the whole long, bony, familiar figure, and it seemed that it was no longer possible to be deceived, but he still hoped that he was wrong and that this long man, who took off his coat and coughed off, was not Nikolai's brother.
Levin loved his brother, but being with him was always a torment.
Now that Levin, under the influence of Agatha Mikhaylovna's thoughts and reminders, was in an unclear, confused state, the upcoming date with his brother seemed particularly difficult.
Instead of the guest of a happy, healthy, foreign man who he hoped would entertain him in his mental confusion, he had to see a brother who understood him through, who would bring him all the soulful thoughts, and would make him speak well.
That's not what he wanted.
Being angry at himself for this nasty feeling, Levin fled to the front. As soon as he saw his brother nearby, this sense of personal frustration immediately disappeared and was replaced by pity.
Fearless as he was, Nikolai's brother had lost his skin and his pain before, and now he's lost weight, and he's worn out.
It was a skeleton covered with skin.
He stood in the front, wriggling with his long, thin neck and tearing off the scarf, and he smiled in a strange way.
When Levin saw that smile, humble and obedient, he felt that the convulsions were squeezing his throat.
'Here, I have come to see you,' said Nikolai with a deaf voice, not looking down on his brother's face for a second. 'I've wanted it for a long time, but it wasn't well.
Now I am very well,' he said, rubbing his beard with large thin palms.
'Yes, yes! 'Saying to Levin.'
And he was even more afraid when he felt with his lips the dryness of his brother's body and saw his large, strangely glowing eyes near him.
A few weeks before that, Levin wrote to his brother that at the sale of the little piece that remained in their house for the week, the brother now had his share, about 2,000 rubles.
Nikolai said that he had now come to get that money and, above all, to go to his nest, touch the ground to gain the strength, like rich men, for the work to be done.
Despite the increased stool, despite its amazing growth, its movements, as usual, were fast and procrastination.
Levin took him to the office.
The brother dressed especially carefully, as he had never done before, brushed his rare straight hair and smiled and entered upstairs.
He was in the sweetest and most funny spirit that Levin often remembered when he was a child. He even mentioned Sergei Ivanovich without anger.
When he saw Agatha Mikhaylovna, he joked with her and asked about the old servants. The news of Parmen Denisic's death had an unpleasant effect on him.
His face was filled with fear; but he immediately recovered.
'He was old enough,' he said, and changed the conversation. 'Yes, I'll stay with you for a month, two, and then to Moscow.'
You know, I've been promised a seat, and I'm on duty.
Now I will have a very different life,' he continued. 'You know, I deleted this woman.
'Mary Nikolaevna?'
What for?
'Ah, she's a nasty woman!
I've done a lot of trouble. 'But he did not tell me what the troubles were.'
He couldn't say that he chased Maria Nikolaevna because the tea was weak, most importantly because she looked after him like she was sick. 'Then, in general, now I want to change my life completely.'
I've done stupid things, of course, like everyone else, but it's the last thing I do, and I don't feel sorry for him.
There would be health, and health, thank God, has recovered.
Levin listened and made up, and couldn't figure out what to say.
Nikolai probably felt the same way; he began to question his brother about his works; and Levin was happy to speak of himself, because he could speak without pretending. He told his brother his plans and actions.
My brother listened, but apparently he wasn't interested.
The two men were so close and close to each other that the slightest movement, the tone of the voice, spoke for all of us more than anything that could be said in words.
Now they both had one thought -- the disease and the nearness of Nikolai's death, which was overwhelming everything else.
But neither dared to speak of it, and for whatever they said without saying that one occupied them, it was all a lie.
Levin was never so happy that the evening was over and had to go to sleep.
Never with any outsider or on any official visit, he was as impersonal and false as he was today.
And consciousness and remorse for this unnaturality made him even more unnatural.
He wanted to cry over his dying beloved brother, and he had to listen and talk about how he would live.
Since the house was damp and the room alone was drowned, Levin put his brother to sleep in his own bedroom behind the partition.
My brother went to bed -- sleeping or not sleeping, but as a sick man, he turned around, coughed and, when he couldn't cough, he groaned.
Sometimes when he sighed hard, he said, "Oh, my God!"
Sometimes when he was soaking wet, he said, "Oh! Shit!"
Levin stayed up for a long time listening to him.
Levin's thoughts were diverse, but the end of all thoughts was one: death.
Death, the inevitable end of all things, for the first time with irresistible force, appeared to him.
And this death, which here, in this beloved brother, is a groaning and indifferent to the habit of calling that god, the devil, was not as far away as he thought it would be.
She was in him, too -- he felt it.
Not now, so tomorrow, not tomorrow, so in thirty years, doesn't it?
And what was this inevitable death -- not only did he not know, not only did he never think about it, but he did not know or dare think about it.
"I'm working, I want to do something, and I forgot it's gonna end up dead."
He sat on the bed in the dark, trembling and hugging his knees, and, by holding his breath from the stress of his mind, he thought.
But the more he made his point, the more it became clear to him that it was certainly so that he really forgot, he looked at one little thing in his life -- that death would come and it would end, that nothing should have started and that there was no way to help it. Yeah, it was terrible, but it was.
"I'm still alive.
Now what shall we do, what shall we do?" 'He spoke with despair.'
He lit the candle and carefully stood up and went to the mirror and began to look at his face and hair.
Yeah, there was gray hair in the temples. He opened his mouth.
The back teeth began to deform.
He exposed his muscley hands.
Yeah, a lot of strength.
But Nicolenka, who was breathing the rest of her lungs, also had a healthy body. And suddenly he remembered when they went to bed together with their children and waited only for Fedor Bogdanich to come out of the door to throw pillows at each other and laugh at each other, to laugh unstoppablely, so that even fear of Fedor Bogdanich could not stop it from over the edge, smashing and smug consciousness of the happiness of life.
"And now this curled-up empty breast... "and I, who doesn't know why and what will happen to me..."
'Hah!
Mha!
Shit!
What do you care if you're awake? 'Called his brother's voice.
'Okay, I don't know, insomnia.
'And I slept well, and now I have no sweat.'
Look, feel your shirt. No sweat?
Levin felt, went behind the partition, put out the candle, but remained awake for a long time.
He just learned a little bit about how to live, how a new, insoluble question -- death -- appeared.
"Well, he dies, well, he dies by spring, well, how do you help him?
What can I tell him?
What do I know about this?
I forgot it was there."
Levin has long commented that when people are embarrassed by their overcompensation, obedience, they will soon become intolerable because of their excessive demands and pickiness.
He felt it would happen to his brother.
Indeed, Brother Nikolai's mildness did not last long.
From the other morning, he became annoying and rashly picked on his brother, touching him for the sickest places.
Levin felt guilty and could not correct it.
He felt that if they weren't both pretending to say what they were called to say, which is just what they think and feel, they'd just look into each other's eyes, and Constantin would just say, "You're gonna die, you're gonna die, you're gonna die!" 'And Nikolai would only say, 'I know I'm going to die, but I'm afraid, I'm afraid, I'm afraid, I'm afraid!'
And they wouldn't have said anything else if they'd just said it like that.
But it was impossible to live, and that's why Konstantin tried to do what he'd been trying to do all his life and not know how to do and what he was watching. Many people were so good at doing what they couldn't live without: he tried to say things that weren't what he thought, and he always felt that it was fake, that his brother was caught up in it, and he got annoyed by it.
On the third day, Nikolai called his brother to tell him his plan again and started not only condemning him but deliberately mixing him with communism.
'You just took a thought from someone else, but you disfigured it, and you want to attach it to the unappreciated.'
'I'm telling you, it has nothing to do with anything.
They reject the fairness of property, capital, inheritance, and I, without denying this main incentive (Levin was disgusted by the fact that he used such words, but since he became interested in his work, he has been reluctant to use more and more non-Russian words), I only want to regulate work.
'That is, you took someone else's thought, cut off everything that formed her strength, and you want to make sure it's something new,' said Nikolai, pissed off in his tie.
'My thought has nothing to do with...'
'There,' said Nikolai Levin, angryly glittering with his eyes and ironicly smiling, 'there is at least beauty, as to say, geometrical -- clarity, certainty.
Maybe it's utopia. But let's say you can do it from the past tabula rasa: no property, no family, work is done, but you have nothing...
'Why are you mixing?' I was never a communist.
'And I have been, and I find that it is premature, but reasonable and has a future like Christianity in the first centuries.
'I only believe that labour must be seen from a natural test point of view, i.e. to study it, to recognize its properties, and...
'This is totally in vain.
This force finds itself, by its degree of development, a well-known way of doing things.
There were slaves everywhere, then metheyers; and we have a busy job, we have rent, we have a Batratch job -- what are you looking for?
Levin suddenly became hot with these words, because deep down he was afraid that it was true -- the truth is that he wanted to balance communism with certain forms and that it was hardly possible.
'I seek the means to work productively for myself and for the worker.
I want to arrange...' he answered hotly.
'You don't want to do anything; it's just, as you've lived your whole life, you want to be original, to show that you're not just exploiting men, but with an idea.'
'Well, you think so,' and leave it! 'Saying to Levin, feeling that his left cheek muscle was jumping inexorably.'
'You had no conviction, and you had no conviction, but only to comfort yourself with your ego.'
'Well, that's fine, and leave me alone!
'And I will!
It's about time, and get the hell out of here!
And I'm so sorry I came!
As much as Levin tried to calm his brother, Nikolai didn't want to hear anything, said that it was much better to separate, and Konstantin saw that his brother had simply become insufferable.
Nikolai was about to leave when Konstantin came to him again and insanely asked for an apology if he had insulted him.
'Ah, generosity! 'Cause Nikolai said, and smiled. 'If you want to be right, I can give you pleasure.'
You're right, but I'm gonna leave!
Just before he left, Nikolai kissed him and said, suddenly taking a weird look at his brother seriously:
'Don't remember me, Kostya! 'And his voice shuddered.
Those were the only words that were spoken sincerely.
Levin realized that these words meant, "You see and you know I'm bad, and maybe we won't see each other again."
Levin understood this, and tears burst out of his eyes.
He kissed his brother again, but he couldn't and could not tell him.
On the third day after his brother left, Levin went abroad.
When Levin met the railway with Shcherbatsky, Kitty's cousin, he was very surprised by his grimness.
'What is wrong with you?' asked Shcherbatsky.
'Nothing, so there's not much fun in the world.
'How little?' Let's go to Paris with me instead of some Mulouse.
Look how fun it is!
'No, I'm done. I have to die.
'That's the thing!' said Scherbatsky, laughing. 'I was just about to begin.
'And so did I recently, but now I know I'm about to die.
Levin said what he had really thought about lately.
He saw nothing but death or nearness to it. But what he did was all the more so for him.
You should have lived your life sometime before death.
The darkness covered everything for him; but it was because of that darkness that he felt that the only leading thread in the darkness was his work, and he grasped and held on to it.
PART FOUR
Karenina, husband and wife, continued to live in the same house, met every day, but were completely alien to each other.
Alexei Alexandrovich made it a rule to see his wife every day so that the maid would not have the right to make assumptions, but he would avoid eating at home.
He had never been to the house of Alexei Alexandrovich, but Anna saw him outside the house, and the husband knew it.
The situation was painful for all three, and none of them could have lived in that situation for a day had it not been expected that it would change and that it was only a temporary hardship that would pass.
Alexey Alexandrovich expected this passion to pass away, just like everything goes away, that all of it will be forgotten and his name will remain undignified.
Anna, on whom the situation depended and for whom it was the most painful of all, carried it because she not only waited but was firmly convinced that all of it would soon be released and understood.
She was determined not to know that she would untie the situation, but she was sure it would come very soon.
He was also waiting for something independent of him to explain all the difficulties.
In the middle of winter, Wronsky spent a very boring week.
He was assigned to a foreign prince who had come to Petersburg and had to show him the sights of Petersburg.
He himself was represented, and he also had the art of maintaining himself with dignity and respect and had a habit of dealing with such persons; that was why he was attached to the prince.
But his duty seemed very difficult to him.
The prince wanted nothing to be missed that he would be asked at home if he had seen it in Russia; and he himself wanted to enjoy as much Russian pleasure as possible. He was obliged to lead him both ways.
In the mornings, they went to see sightseeings, and in the evenings, they enjoyed national pleasures.
The prince enjoyed extraordinary health even between the princes; and gymnastics and good care for his body, he made himself so strong that, despite the excesses he enjoyed, he was fresh as a large green, glossy Dutch cucumber.
The prince traveled extensively and found that one of the main benefits of the current ease of communication was the accessibility of national pleasures.
He was in Spain, where he gave serenades and drew close to a Spanish woman playing mandolin.
Hemez was killed in Switzerland. In England, he rode a red fracco across fences and killed 200 pheasants on a bet.
In Turkey he was in harem, in India he rode an elephant, and now in Russia he wanted to taste all Russian pleasures.
It was worth a lot of effort to distribute all the Russian pleasures offered to the prince by various individuals. There were rats, pancakes, bear hunts, threes, gypsies, and chutes with Russian dishes.
And the prince took the Russian spirit with extreme ease, beat the trays with the dishes, put the gypsy on her knees, and seemed to ask, ‘ What else, or is that the whole Russian spirit? '
In fact, of all the Russian pleasures, the prince liked the French actresses, the ballet dancer and the white seal champagne most.
He had a habit of princes, but because he had changed himself lately, or because he was too close to that prince, this week seemed to him to be a terrible one. He's been feeling this whole week, like a person who'd be attached to a dangerous lunatic, afraid of a lunatic and, together, near him, afraid of his mind.
He constantly felt the need, not for a second, to weaken the tone of strict official respect in order not to be insulted.
The Prince's way of dealing with the very people who, to the surprise of Wronski, had gone out of their way to give him Russian pleasures was contemptible.
His judgment about Russian women, which he wanted to study, has often led the city to become blushing.
The main reason why the prince was especially hard was because he saw himself in him. And what he saw in that mirror didn't flatter his ego.
It was a very stupid, and very confident, and a very healthy, and a very clean man, and nothing else.
He was a gentleman -- it was true, and Wronsky couldn't deny it.
He was a roven and unsatisfied with superiors, free and easy to deal with equals, and contemptiblely kind to the lower ones.
He himself was such and considered it to be a great dignity; but with regard to the prince, he was inferior, and this contemptible and friendly attitude against him offended him.
"Stupid beef! Am I like this?" 'He thought.'
Anyway, when he said goodbye to him on the seventh day, before he left for Moscow, and received his thanks, he was happy to get rid of this awkward position and unpleasant mirror.
He said goodbye to him at the station, coming back from a bear hunt, where they had an all-nighter of Russian youth.
When he returned home, he found a note from Anna.
She wrote, "I'm sick and unhappy.
I can't leave, but I can't miss you.
Come tonight. "At seven o'clock, Alexis Alexandrovich goes to the council and stays until ten."
After thinking for a moment about the strangeness of her calling him directly to her, despite her husband's request not to accept him, he decided that he would go.
He was made colonel in this winter, came out of the regiment and lived alone.
After having breakfast, he immediately lay on the couch, and at five minutes' notice of the ugly scenes he had seen in recent days, he was confused and connected with the image of Anna and the man who had played an important role in the bear hunt; and he fell asleep.
He woke up in the dark, trembling with fear, and lighted the candle in haste.
"What is it? What?
What's the scary thing I saw in my sleep?
Yeah, yeah. You know, the guy who's a concoct seems to be little, dirty, with his beard cocky, doing something upside down and all of a sudden talking some weird words in French.
Yes, there was nothing else in his dream,' he said to himself. 'But why was it so terrible?'
He vividly remembered the man again and the incomprehensible French words that the man had spoken, and the horror ran through his back cold.
"What nonsense!" 'I thought and looked at my watch.'
It was half past nine.
He called a man, got dressed in a hurry, and went out on the porch, completely forgot about sleeping, and was only suffering because he was late.
As he drove up to Karen's porch, he looked at the watch and saw what was ten minutes past nine.
A tall, small carriage, loaded with a couple of grays, stood at the door.
He recognized Anna's carriage. "She's coming to me," he thought, "and it would have been better.
I hate to come into this house.
Still, I can't hide,' he said to himself, and with the techniques he had learned since childhood, a man with nothing to be ashamed of came out of his sleigh and came to the door.
The door opened, and the doorman with a blanket on his hand called the carriage.
Although he was not used to seeing the details, he noticed now a surprising expression with which the doorman looked at him.
At the very door, he almost ran into Alexey Alexandrovich.
The gas horn lit a bloodless, shoved face under a black hat and a white tie shiny because of the coat beaver.
Karen's immobile, dull eyes leapt toward the face of Vronski.
He bowed down, and Alexey Alexandrovich, chewing his mouth, raised his hand to the hat and passed.
He saw him not looking back, sitting in a carriage, taking a blanket and binoculars out the window and running away.
Vronsky entered the front.
His eyebrows were frowned upon, and his eyes glittered with evil and proud glitter.
"Here's the situation!" he thought. 'If he fought, stood up for his honor, I could act, express my feelings; but this weakness or vice...'
He puts me in the position of a liar, but I do not want to be, nor do I want to be."
Since his explanation with Anna, the garden of Wrath has changed a lot.
He willingly submitted to Anna's weakness, which was given to him all and expected only him to decide her fate, and went on to submit to everything for a long time to stop thinking that this connection might end, as he thought at the time.
His honest plans turned back on him again, and he felt that he had come out of the circle of activity in which everything had been defined, gave up all his senses, and that felt more and more bound him to her.
Even in the front, he heard her moving steps. He realized she was waiting for him, listening, and now she's back in the living room.
'No! 'She cried when she saw him, and at the first sound of her voice tears came into her eyes,' no, if this continues, it will be much more, much earlier!
'What, my friend?
'What?
I'm waiting, I'm suffering, an hour, two...
No, I won't!
I can't fight with you.
Right, you couldn't.
No, I won't!
She put both hands on his shoulders and looked at him for a long time with a deep, enthralled, and together with a test glance.
She studied his face in a time she hadn't seen him.
She, like every date, had one imaginary idea of him (unmatched, impossible in reality) with him as he was.
'Did you meet him? 'She asked when they sat by the table under the lamp.' 'This is your punishment for being late.
'Yes, but how?
Was he supposed to be on the board?
'He was and came back and went again.
But that's okay. Don't talk about it.
Where have you been?
All with the prince?
She knew all the details of his life.
He wanted to say that he stayed up all night and fell asleep, but when he looked at her excited and happy face, he felt ashamed.
And he said he had to go and report the Prince's departure.
'But now it's over?
Did he leave?
'Thank God it's over.
You wouldn't believe how much I couldn't bear it.
'Why?'
Because this is the eternal life of all of you young men,' she said, with her eyebrows full, and, having taken up the knitting that was on the table, she began to grow a hook out of it, without looking at him.
'I have long left this life,' he said, wondering at the change in her face and trying to understand its meaning. 'And I confess,' he said, with a smile of his dense white teeth, 'I looked like a mirror this week, looking at this life, and it made me uncomfortable.
She was knitting, not knitting, but looking at him with a strange, shiny, unfriendly look.
'Lisa came to see me this morning -- they are not afraid to come to me despite Countess Lydia Ivanovna --' she said, 'and told me about your Finnish evening.
That's disgusting!
'I just wanted to say that...
She interrupted him.
'Is it Thhere that you knew before?'
'I mean...
'How nasty you are, men!
How you can't imagine that a woman can't forget it,' she said, getting hotter and more and thus revealing to him the cause of her irritation. 'In particular a woman who cannot know your life.'
What do I know? What did I know? 'She said,' what you will tell me.
And how do I know if you were telling me the truth...
'Anna! You insult me.
Don't you believe me?
Didn't I tell you I didn't have a thought that I didn't tell you?
'Yes, yes,' she said, apparently trying to drive away jealous thoughts. 'But if you knew how hard it is for me!
I believe you, I believe you...
So what did you say?
But he couldn't remember right away what he wanted to say.
These attacks of jealousy, which have been more and more frequent in recent times, have horrified him and, as he tried to hide it, have cooled him for her, even though he knew that the cause of jealousy was his love for him.
How many times did he tell himself that her love was happy; and she loved him, as a woman could love, for whom love outweighed all the good things in life -- and he was far further away from happiness than when he followed her from Moscow.
At that time, he thought he was unhappy, but happiness was ahead; now he felt that the best happiness was already back.
She wasn't at all the way he saw her the first time.
And morally and physically she's changed to the worst.
She expanded, and in her face, while she was talking about an actress, there was an evil expression that distorted her face.
He looked at her as a man looked at a rippled flower in which he could hardly recognize the beauty for which he had riled and destroyed him.
And even though he felt that when his love was stronger, he could, if he wanted to, rip that love out of his heart, but now that he felt like he didn't feel love for her at that moment, he knew that his connection with her could not be broken.
'Well, well, what did you want to tell me about the prince?
I ran, I chased the devil away,' she added.
It was called jealousy between them. 'Yes, so what did you start talking about the prince?
Why was it so hard for you?
'Oh, it is unbearable!' he said, seeking to catch the thread of lost thought. 'He does not benefit from a close acquaintance.
If he were to be identified, he was a well-fed animal who received the first medals at the exhibition, and nothing more,' he said with a displeasure, interested in her.
'No, how?' 'She objected.' 'Cause he's seen a lot of things, wasn't he educated?
&lt; &lt; It is a different education -- their education. &gt;&gt;
It can be seen that it is designed only to have the right to despise education, as they all despise, except animals of pleasure.
'You all love these animals pleasures,' she said, and again he noticed a dark look that avoided them.
'Why are you so protective of him? 'He said, smiling.'
'I don't defend, I don't care at all; but I think if you didn't like these pleasures yourself, you could have refused.'
And it gives you pleasure to look at Theresa in Eve's suit...
'Once again, again, the devil!' took the hand that she had put on the table, and kissed her, and said Vronsky.
'Yes, but I can't!
You don't know how hard I've been waiting for you!
I don't think I'm jealous.
I'm not jealous; I believe you when you're here with me, but when you're on your own leading a life I don't understand...
She swerved away from him, finally pulled the hook out of the knitting, and quickly, with her index finger, she began to curl up one by one loop of white, shining under the light of the wool lamp, and quickly, nervously turned the thin brush into a stitched sleeve.
'What do you mean?' Where did you meet Alexei Alexandrovich? &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&lt;i&lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &lt;i&gt; &gt; suddenly, suddenly, her voice was not naturalally ringing. &lt;i&gt;&gt;&gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt;&gt;&gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt; &gt
'We bumped into each other at the door.
'And he bowed to you like that?
She drew out her face and, with her eyes half closed, quickly changed her face, folded her hands, and in her beautiful face he suddenly saw the very look on his face with which he had worshipped Aleksandrovich.
He smiled, and she laughed funnyly at that cute chest laugh, which was one of her greatest charms.
'I totally don't understand him,' said Vronsky. 'If, after your explanation, he had broken up with you, if he had called me to a duel... but this I do not understand, how can he bear such a situation?' He's suffering, I can tell.
'He? 'She said with laughter.' 'He is perfectly pleased.
'Why do we all suffer when everything could be so good?'
'Not him.
Don't I know him, the lie he's fed up with?
Can you feel anything, live like he lives with me?
He doesn't understand anything, he doesn't feel anything.
Can a man who feels anything live with his criminal wife in the same house?
Can you talk to her? You tell her?
And again, she introduced him involuntarily. "You, ma chore, you, Anna!"
'It is not a man, it is not a man, it is a doll!
No one knows, but I do.
Oh, if I were in his shoes, I'd kill him a long time ago, I'd tear this wife like me apart, not say, you, ma shere, Anna.
It's not a man, it's a ministerial car.
He doesn't understand that I'm your wife, that he's a stranger, that he's a stranger...
'You are wrong, and you are wrong, my friend,' he said, trying to calm her down. 'But still, let's not talk about him.
Tell me, what were you doing?
What's wrong with you?
What is this disease, and what did the doctor say?
She looked at him with ridiculous joy.
Apparently, she found other funny and ugly sides in her husband and waited for time to express them.
'I know it's not a disease, it's your situation.
When will it be?
The ridiculous glitter in her eyes has gone out, but the other smile -- the knowledge of something unknown to him and the quiet sadness -- has replaced her former expression.
'Soon, soon.'
You said our situation was painful, that we had to untie it.
If you knew how hard it is for me, what I would give to love you freely and with courage!
I wouldn't be tormented and you wouldn't be jealous...
And it's gonna be soon, but it's not what we think.
And when she thought about how it would be, she felt so sorry for herself that tears looked at her eyes, and she couldn't continue.
She put a shiny ring under the lamp and a white hand on his sleeve.
'It won't be what we think it will be.'
I didn't want to tell you that, but you made me.
Soon, it's all gonna break up, and we're all gonna calm down, and we're not gonna be tormented anymore.
'I do not understand,' he said, understanding.
'Did you ask when?
Soon. And I can't take it.
Don't interrupt! 'And she hastened to speak.' 'I know that, and I know it right. I'm gonna die, and I'm really glad I'm gonna die and get rid of myself and you.
Tears flowed out of her eyes; he leaned toward her hand, and began kissing, seeking to hide his excitement, which he knew had no basis, but he could not overcome it.
'That's it, that's better,' she said, shaking his hand with a strong movement. 'Here's one thing, one thing we have left.
He remembered and raised his head.
'What nonsense! What pointless nonsense are you talking about?
'No, it's true.
'What, what's true?
'That I would die.' I had a dream.
'Sleep? 'Wronsky repeated, and instantly remembered his man in his sleep.
'Yes, dream,' she said. 'I've had this dream a long time ago.
I saw that I ran into my bedroom, that I had to take something there, learn something; you know how it is in a dream,' she said with horror, opening her eyes wide; and there was something in the bedroom, in the corner.
'Oh, what nonsense!
How can you believe...
But she wouldn't let me kill her.
What she said was too important to her.
'And it turned, and I see it's a man with a cocky beard, small and scary.
I wanted to run, but he leaned over the bag and his hands were sniffing around...
She pictured him digging in a bag. The horror was on her face.
And when he remembered his dream, he felt the same horror that filled his soul.
'He digs and sentences in French, soon and soon, and, you know, graces: 'Il fat le battre le fer, le broyer, le peter...'
And I wanted to wake up, wake up... but I woke up in my sleep.
And I started asking myself what that meant. And Corney says to me, "You're going to die, you're going to die, you're going to die, you're going to die, you're going to die, you're going to die, you're going to die, you're going to die."
And I woke up...
'What nonsense, what nonsense!' he said, but he himself felt that there was no credibility in his voice.
'But let's not talk.
Call me and I'll get you some tea.
Wait, I'm not gonna...
But suddenly she stopped.
The expression of her face changed instantly.
Terror and excitement were suddenly replaced by an expression of quiet, serious, and blissful attention.
He couldn't understand the significance of that change.
She heard the movement of her new life.
Alexey Alexandrovich went to the Italian opera, as he intended, after meeting him on his porch with Wronski.
He sat there two acts and saw everyone he needed.
When he returned home, he carefully examined the hanger and, noting that there was no military coat, he usually went to his place. But, disgustingly, he didn't go to bed and walked back and forth in his office until three o'clock in the morning.
A feeling of anger at a wife who did not want to respect decency and fulfil her only condition of not accepting her lover was uneasy.
She failed to comply with his demands, and he must punish her and carry out his threat of demanding a divorce and taking away his son.
He knew all the difficulties involved in this case, but he said he would, and now he has to execute the threat.
The Countess Lydia Ivanovna suggested that this was the best way out of his situation, and in recent times the practice of divorce has led the case to such an improvement that he saw the possibility of overcoming formal difficulties.
In addition, trouble does not go alone, and the affairs of the organization of foreigners and the irrigation of the fields of Zarai Obernia have caused him such trouble in his service that he has been in a state of extreme irritation lately.
He stayed up all night, and his anger, growing in some great progress, reached the extremes by morning.
And he put on his clothes in haste, as if he were carrying a cup of anger, and feared that he would shed the energy he needed to explain it to his wife, and came to her as soon as he knew she was up.
Anna, who thought she knew her husband so well, was struck by his appearance when he entered her.
His forehead was frowned, and his eyes looked darkly ahead of themselves, avoiding her eyes; his mouth was firm and contemptible.
In his walk, in his movements, in the sound of his voice, he had the determination and firmness that his wife had never seen in him.
He entered the room and, without saying hello to her, went straight to her desk and took the keys and opened the drawer.
'What do you want?- she screamed.
'The letters of your lover,' he said.
'They aren't here,' she said, closing the box; but he realized by this move that he had guessed right, and, with a rude push on her hand, quickly grabbed a briefcase in which he knew that she had planted the most appropriate paperwork.
She wanted to rip out the briefcase, but he pushed her away.
'Sit down! I need to talk to you,' he said, putting the briefcase under the mouse and pressing it so hard with his elbow that his shoulder rose.
She stared at him with surprise and humility.
'I told you I wouldn't let you take your lover with me.
'I needed to see him so that...'
She stopped without finding any fiction.
'I do not go into the details of what a woman needs to see a lover for.
'I wanted to, I just...' she said, when she flashed.
That rudeness of him annoyed her and gave her the courage. 'Do you not feel that it is easy for you to insult me? 'She said.'
'Insulting an honest man and an honest woman, but telling a thief that he is a thief, there is only la constatation d'un fat.
'This new feature -- I didn't know about you yet.
'You call it cruelty that a husband gives his wife freedom by giving her an honest name only under the condition of decency.'
Is that cruel?
'It's worse than cruelty, it's mean, if you want to know already! -- with an explosion of anger, Anna screamed and, upstairs, wanted to leave.
'No! 'He cried with his penetrating voice, which now rose with a note above the ordinary, and grabbed her hand with his thumbs so hard that the red marks were left on her by the bracelet that he had pressed, forced her to lie down.'
Dirty?
If you want to use that word, the meanness is to abandon the husband, the son of the lover, and eat the bread of the husband!
She's overstepped her head.
Not only did she not say what she said to her lover yesterday, that he was her husband and that he was redundant; she didn't think so.
She felt the justice of his words and only said quietly:
'You can't describe my situation worse than I understand it myself, but why are you saying all this?
'Why am I saying this? Why? 'He continued with the same anger.' 'To let you know that since you have not fulfilled my will to respect decency, I will accept men to end this situation.'
'It will soon be over, and so it will be,' she said, and again tears at the thought of a near, now the desired death came to her eyes.
'It will end sooner than you and your lover come up with!
You need the satisfaction of animal passion...
'Alexei Alexandrovich!
I'm not saying it's a little sloppy, but it's not decent to hit a lying man.
'Yes, you only remember yourself, but the suffering of the man who was your husband is not of interest to you. You don't care that his whole life was ruined, that he sang... that pede... that he suffered.
Alexei Alexandrovich spoke so soon that he was confused and could not speak that word.
He talked him out at the end of the melody. She got funny and now she's ashamed that she might be laughing at something like this.
And the first time she felt for him for a moment, she moved into him, and she felt sorry for him.
But what could she say or do?
She dropped her head and kept quiet.
He also kept quiet for some time and then spoke with a less penetrating, cold voice, stressing the words chosen at random, without any particular importance,
'I have come to tell you...' he said...
She looked at him.
"No, it seemed to me," she thought, remembering the look on his face when he was confused on the word peling, "no, can a man with these murky eyes feel anything with this smug calm?"
'I can't change anything,' she whispered.
'I have come to tell you that I am leaving for Moscow tomorrow and will not return to this house again, and you will be informed of my decision through a lawyer to whom I will entrust the divorce case.
But my son will move in with his sister,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, remembering with effort what he wanted to say about his son.
'You need Serezha to hurt me,' she said, looking down at him. 'You don't love him...'
Leave Serezha!
'Yes, I have lost even my love for my son because he has my revulsion for you. But I will take him.'
Goodbye!
And he wanted to leave, but now she's holding him.
'Alexei Alexandrovich, leave Serezha! 'She whispered again.' 'I have nothing more to say.
Leave Serezha to my...
I'm about to give birth, leave him alone!
Alexei Alexandrovich burst into flames and, after ripping out her hand, went out of the room silently.
The reception room of the famous Peterburg lawyer was full when Aleksey Alexandrovich entered it.
Three ladies: an old lady, a young woman and a merchant, three masters: one German banker with a finger ring, the other a trader with a beard, and the third, an angry vice-mundir official with a cross on his neck, apparently long overdue.
Two assistants wrote on the tables, squeaking feathers.
The writing supplies before which Alexey Alexandrovich was a hunter were incredibly good, but he couldn't help but notice it.
One of the helpers, not getting up, sniffing around, angryly turned to Alexei Alexandrovich:
'What do you want?
'I'm dealing with a lawyer.
'The lawyer is busy,' replied the assistant strictly, pointing his finger at the waiters, and kept writing.
'Can't he find time? 'Alexei Alexandrovich said.'
'He has no free time, he is always busy...'
You're welcome to wait.
'Would you care to file my card,' said Alexis Alexandrovich with dignity, seeing the need to open your incognito?
The assistant took the card and apparently, without approving its contents, walked through the door.
Aleksey Alexandrovich sympathized with the public court in principle, but with some details of its application, he did not fully sympathize, according to his superior service relationship, and condemned them to the extent that he could condemn anything above what he had approved.
His entire life had been spent in administrative activities, and therefore, when he had no sympathy for anything, his lack of sympathy had been mitigated by the recognition of the need for errors and the possibility of correction in every case.
In the new judicial institutions, he did not approve of the conditions under which the lawyer had been placed.
But he still had no case before the bar and therefore did not approve of her only in theory; now his disapproval was further exacerbated by the unpleasant impression he had received from the admitted lawyer.
'They will now come out,' said the assistant; and indeed, two minutes later, a long figure of an old jurist who was meeting with a lawyer and the lawyer himself appeared in the door.
The lawyer was a small, corny, slutty man with a black and red beard, a bright, long eyebrow, and a hanging forehead. He was dressed like a groom, from a tie and a chain of doubles to lacquer boots.
The face was smart, manly, and the outfit was frantic and bad taste.
'I think so,' said the lawyer, turning to Alexei Alexandrovich. And, darkly missing Karenina by himself, he locked the door.
'Would you like that?' 'He pointed to the chair at the paper-based desk and sat down himself in the chair, rubbing small hands with short, white-haired fingers and bowing his head.
But he just calmed down in his position, as moth flew over the table.
A lawyer with a speed that couldn't be expected of him, torn his hands, caught a moth, and took the same position again.
'Before I start talking about my case,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, surprisedly following the lawyer's movement, 'I must note that the case I have to talk about with you must be a secret.
A slight smile spread out a little redheaded, hanging lawyer's moustache.
'I would not be a lawyer if I could not keep the secrets entrusted to me.
But if you want confirmation...
Alexey Alexandrovich looked at his face and saw that the gray, intelligent eyes laughed and everyone knew.
'Do you know my last name?' 'Alexei Alexandrovich continued.
'I know you and your useful ones,' said the lawyer, leaning down.
Alexei Alexandrovich sighed with spirit. But once he made up his mind, he continued with his pompous voice, not his robe, not by sticking in and emphasizing some words.
'I am unhappy,' he began, 'to be deceived by my husband, and I wish to legally break off my relationship with my wife, i.e. divorce, but in such a way that the son does not remain with his mother.
The lawyer &apos; s gray eyes tried not to laugh, but they jumped with unbridled joy, and Aleksey Alexandrovich saw that there was more than one ray--the reach of a man receiving a favourable order -- there was celebration and delight, there was a glitter that looked like the sinister glitter he saw in his wife &apos; s eyes.
'Would you like me to help you get a divorce?'
'Yes, indeed, but I must warn you that I risk abusing your attention.
I've only come to consult you in advance.
I want a divorce, but it's important to me the forms that make it possible.
It's possible that if the forms don't match my demands, I'll drop the legal action.
'Oh, it is always so,' said the lawyer, 'and it is always in your will.
The lawyer turned his eyes on Alexei Alexandrovich's feet, feeling that he could insult his client by his unbridled joy.
He looked at the moth that flew in front of his nose and pulled his hand, but did not catch it out of respect for the position of Alexei Alexandrovich.
&quot; Although I am aware of our general legal provisions on this subject, &quot; he continued, &quot; I would like to know at all the forms in which these kinds of cases are actually being carried out.
'You wish,' answered the lawyer without raising your eyes, and not without pleasure entering the tone of my client's speech, that I may set out to you the ways in which your wish may be fulfilled.
And to confirm the inclination of the head of Alexey Alexandrovich, he continued, occasionally only looking a little at the blushing face of Alexei Alexandrovich.
'The divorce according to our laws,' he said, with a slight insignificance to our laws, 'is possible, as you know, in the following cases....
Wait!-- he turned to the assistant who had snuck out the door, but he got up and said a few words and sat down again. 'In the following cases: the spouses &apos; physical defects, then the unknown five-year absence, &apos; he said, with a hairy short finger, &quot; then adultery &quot; (the word he said with visible pleasure).
The following units (he continued to bend his fat fingers, although cases and units obviously could not be classified together): the husband's or wife's physical disability, and then the husband's or wife's adultery. 'As all the fingers came out, he dispersed them all and continued: 'It is a theoretical look, but I believe you have done me the honor of addressing me to learn a practical application.
And so, in line with ancestorism, I have to report to you that divorce cases all come to the following: no physical defects, how can I understand? And also the unknown absence?...
Alexei Alexandrovich had his head bowed in the affirmative.
'Comes to the following: adultery of one of the spouses and the finding of the criminal party by mutual agreement and, in addition to such agreement, the evidence is involuntary.'
I must say that the latter case is rarely found in practice,' said the lawyer, and, looking briefly at Alexei Alexandrovich, shut up as a gun dealer, describing the benefits of both weapons and awaiting the choice of his buyer.
But Aleksey Alexandrovich was silent, so counsel continued: 'The most common and simple, reasonable, I believe, is adultery by mutual agreement.
I wouldn't allow myself to say that if I spoke to a man who wasn't developed,' said the lawyer, 'but I think that's understandable to us.
Aleksey Alexandrovich was, however, so upset that he did not immediately understand the reasonableness of adultery by mutual agreement and expressed this perplexity in his view; but the lawyer immediately helped him:
'People can no longer live together -- this is the fact, and if both agree, details and formalities become irrelevant. At the same time, it is the simplest and surest means.
Alexei Alexandrovich is quite clear now.
But he had religious requirements that prevented him from accepting this measure.
'This is beyond question in the present case,' he said. 'There is only one possible case: the evidence is involuntary, confirmed by the letters I have.
When the letters were mentioned, the lawyer put on his lips and made a thin, condescending and contemptuous sound.
'Let me see,' he began. 'The affairs of this kind are resolved, as you know, by a spiritual agency; the protopopians in this kind of business are great hunters to the slightest detail,' he said with a smile showing sympathy for the taste of the protopops. &quot; Letters can no doubt confirm in part; but evidence must be obtained directly, i.e. by witnesses.
In fact, if you would honor me with your trust, give me a choice of measures to be taken.
Whoever wants results is allowed the means.
'If so...' began the brilliance, but in that time, the lawyer stood up and went back to the door to the assistant who had interrupted him.
'Tell her we're not on cheap goods! 'He said, and went back to Alexei Alexandrovich.'
Going back to the spot, he caught another moth.
"It'll be good to have my reps by summer!" 'He thought, frowning.'
'So you dared to speak...' he said.
'I will inform you in writing of my decision,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, standing up, and he came to the table.
A little silent, he said: 'In your words I can conclude, therefore, that divorce is possible.
I'd like you to tell me what your terms are.
'It is possible that everyone, if you give me full freedom of action,' said the lawyer, without answering the question. 'When can I expect to hear from you?' 'The lawyer asked, moving toward the door and the glitter and the eyes and the lacquer boots.'
'In a week.
Your answer, then, is whether you accept the motion in this case and under what conditions you will be so kind as to inform me.
'Very good.'
The lawyer humbly bowed, let the client out of the door and, remaining alone, gave up his joyous feeling.
He had so much fun that, contrary to his rules, he had made a concession to a young lady who was trading and stopped catching moths, finally deciding that by the winter to come, the furniture had to be broken with velvet like Sigonin's.
Alexey Alexandrovich won a brilliant victory in the meeting of the commission on August 17th, but the consequences of that victory cut him off.
A new commission for research on all aspects of foreign life was designed and sent to a place with the extraordinary speed and energy created by Alexey Alexandrovich.
Three months later, the report was submitted.
Aliens were studied in political, administrative, economic, ethnographic, material and religious relations.
The answers to all the questions were well set out, and the answers that were beyond question, since they were not the work of an ever-disguised human mind, but they were all the work of service.
The answers were all the results of official reports, reports from governors and archivists based on reports from county chiefs and good people based, for their part, on reports from county governments and parish priests; therefore, all the answers were beyond doubt.
All those questions about, for example, why there are crop failures, why residents hold on to their beliefs, etc., issues that without the convenience of the service machine are not resolved and cannot be resolved for centuries have been clearly and unequivocally resolved.
And the decision was in favor of Alexey Alexandrovich's opinion.
But Stremov, feeling hurt by his life at the last meeting, used a stunt of surprise by Alexei Alexandrovich when he received the commission's reports.
Stremov, after engaging some other members, suddenly moved to the side of Alexey Alexandrovich and, with heat, not only defended the imposition of the measures offered by Karen, but also proposed other extremes in the same spirit.
These measures, which were reinforced against the basic idea of Alexey Alexandrovich, were taken, and Stremov's tactics were exposed.
These measures, taken to extremes, suddenly turned out to be so stupid that at the same time both the public and public opinion, and the smart ladies and the newspapers, all fell on them, expressing their outrage and against the measures themselves and against their recognized father, Alexei Alexandrovich.
Stremov, on the other hand, withdrew, pretending that he had only blindly followed Karen's plan, and now he himself is surprised and outraged by what has been done. It was Alexei Alexandrovich's.
But despite declining health, despite family sorrows, Alexis Alexandrovich did not give up.
There's been a rift in the commission.
Some members with Stremov at the head justified their error by believing that the audit committee, led by Alexey Alexandrovich, presented the report, and said that reporting to the commission was nonsense and only written paper.
Aleksey Alexandrovich, with a party of people who saw the danger of such a revolutionary attitude towards the papers, continued to support the data produced by the audit commission.
As a result, in higher spheres and even in society, everything was confused, and despite the fact that it was of great interest to all, no one could understand whether there was real poverty and death among foreigners or prosperity.
As a result, and partly as a result of his contempt for his wife's infidelity, his situation became very precarious.
And in this situation, Alexei Alexandrovich made an important decision.
He, to the surprise of the commission, announced that he would ask permission to go to the site to investigate the case himself. And when he asked for permission, he went to the far externia.
Alexey Alexandrovich's departure made a lot of noise, especially since he had officially returned on paper the travel money given to him for 12 horses to travel to his destination.
'I find it very noble,' said Betsy to Princess Soft. 'Why give it to the postal horses when everyone knows there are railroads everywhere now?'
But Princess Softy was opposed, and the opinion of Princess Tversky was even annoying to her.
'It is good for you to say,' she said, 'when you have millions I don't know which ones, and I love it very much when a husband goes to see each other in the summer.
He's very nice and happy to drive, and I've got so much to do, I've got a crew and a cart on that money.
On his way to the far extremities, Alexi Alexandrovich stopped for three days in Moscow.
The next day he arrived, he went to visit the Governor General.
At the intersection of the newspaper alley, where crews and drivers were always crowding, he suddenly heard his name screaming with such a loud and funny voice that he could not help but look back.
On the corner of the sidewalk, in a short fashion coat, with a short fashioned hat, a bakren, a radiant smile of white teeth between red lips, a merry, young, shiny, stood Stepan Arkadić, determined and strong, screaming and demanding stoppage.
He held one hand behind the window, stopped at the corner of the carriage, from which the woman's head was pointed out in a velvet hat and two children's heads, and smiled and manipulated with his son-in-law's hand.
The lady smiled with a good smile and waved her hand to Alexei Alexandrovich.
It was Dolly and the kids.
Alexei Alexandrovich did not want to see anyone in Moscow, but least of all his wife's brother.
He picked up his hat and wanted to drive, but Stepan Arkadić told his coach to stop and ran to him through the snow.
'Well, it is no sin not to send a message!
It's been a while since I was at Dusso's last night, and I see it on the board of "Karenin," and it never occurred to me that it was you! 'Stepan Arkadić said, sneaking in with his head through the window of the carriage.' 'Or I would have come.'
It's so good to see you! 'He said, patting his foot against his foot, to wipe the snow off them.' 'It is no sin not to let me know! 'He repeated it.
'I was once busy; I was very busy,' replied Alexis Alexandrovich, dryly.
'Come on, let's go to your wife, she wants to see you so much.'
Alexey Alexandrovich opened the blanket under which his filthy legs were wrapped, and when he came out of the carriage, he snuck through the snow to Daria Alexandrovna.
'What is this, Alexis Alexandrovich, why are you going around us like this?' 'Yes,' said Dolly, smiling.
'I've been very busy.
It is a great pleasure to see you,' he said in a tone that made it clear that he was upset by it. 'How are you doing?
'Well, what is my lovely Anna?
Alexei Alexandrovich washed something and wanted to leave. But Stepan Arkadić stopped him.
'This is what we'll do tomorrow.
Dolly, call him for lunch!
Let's get Koznyshev and Pessov to buy him some Moscow intellectuals.
'Well, please come,' said Dolly, 'we'll be waiting for you at five, six, if you like.
Well, what's my lovely Anna?
How long ago...
'She is healthy,' groaning, washing. 'It's a pleasure! 'And he went to his carriage.'
'Will you? 'Screaming at Dolly.
Alexey Alexandrovich said something that Dolly couldn't hear in the noise of the moving crews.
'I'll come by tomorrow!' yelled at him, Stepan Arkadić.
Alexey Alexandrovich sat down in the carriage and shoved into it so that he could neither see nor be seen.
'Oh, weirdo! 'Stepan Arkadych said to his wife, and when he looked at the watch, he made a movement in front of his face, meaning a tenderness to his wife and children, and the good women went on the sidewalk.
'Steve!
Steve!-- screamed Dolly red.
He turned around.
'Cause I need to buy Grisha's coat and Tanya's.
Give me the money!
'Nothing, you tell me what I will give,' and he fled with a funny nod on the head of a friend who passed by.
The other day was Sunday.
Stepan Arkadić stopped by the Grand Theatre for a ballet rehearsal and gave Masha Chibisova a good-looking, new-looking dancer, promised on the eve of the crown, and behind the scenes, in the dark of the theater, a good-looking kiss that shined her face out of a gift.
Except for a gift from the corrals, he had to make a date with her after the ballet.
After explaining to her that he could not be at the start of the ballet, he promised that he would come to the last act and take her to dinner.
From the theater, Stepan Arkadić drove to the Hunting Squad, chose his own fish and asparagus for lunch, and at 12 o'clock he was at Dusso's, where he had to be with three people, like he was in one hotel: Levin, who was staying here and had recently come from abroad, had his new boss, who had just come to this high place and reviewed Moscow, and his son-in-law Karenin had to bring him to have lunch.
Stepan Arkadić liked to have lunch, but he was even more fond of giving lunch, a small but sophisticated meal, a drink, and a guest's choice.
He liked the current dinner program very much: the bunks are living, asparagus and la piece de resistance -- wonderful, but simple roast beef and fine guilt: it's food and drink.
And the guests will be Kitty and Levin, and to be discreet, there will be a cousin and Shcherbatsky young, and la piece de resistance of guests -- Koznyshev Sergei and Alexei Alexandrovich.
Sergei Ivanovich -- Moskwich and philosopher, Alexei Alexandrovich -- Peterburger and practical; may the famous enthusiast Pessov, liberalist, talker, musician, historian and cutest 50-year-old boy, who will be a sauce or garrison to Koznyshev and Karenin. He's gonna blow 'em up and throw 'em out.
The money from the merchant for the woods was received and not yet spent, and Dolly has been very nice lately, and the idea of this meal has in all respects been encouraging to Stepan Arkadych.
He was in the happiest position of spirit.
There were two circumstances that were a little unpleasant; but both of those circumstances drowned in the sea of good-willed joy, which was troubled in the soul of Stepan Arkadyich.
These two circumstances were: the first thing he saw yesterday, on the street of Alexei Alexandrovich, was that he was dry and hard on him, and by making that look on the face of Alexei Alexandrovich and that he had not come to them and had not known himself, with the moves he had heard about Anna and Vronski, Stepan Arkadić had guessed that something was wrong between his husband and his wife.
It was one nasty thing. Another unpleasant thing was that the new boss, like all the new bosses, had a reputation for being a terrible man, rising at 6 a.m., working like a horse, demanding the same job from the subordinates.
In addition, the new commander had a reputation as a bear in his address and was said to be in the opposite direction to that of the former commander, who still belonged to Stepan Arkadić himself.
Yesterday, Stepan Arkadić served in the uniform, and the new boss was very kind and spoke to Oblonski as a friend; therefore, Stepan Arkadić considered it his duty to visit him in a surprise.
The idea that the new boss might not well accept him was another unpleasant circumstance. But Stepan Arkadić instinctively felt that everything would be fine.
"All men, all men, just as we are sinners, why should we be angry and quarreling?" 'He thought when he entered the hotel.'
'Hey, Vasily,' he said, 'in a hat of bacon, walking down the hall and turning to a familiar footman,' you let the buckenbards go? Levin is the seventh number, huh?
Please escort me.
Let's see, Count Anichkin (this was the new boss) will accept?
'I'm listening,' answered Vasily smiling. 'It has been a long time since anyone complained to us.
'I was yesterday, only from another entrance.'
Is that the seventh?
Levin stood with a Tver man in the middle of the room and archin measured the fresh bear's skin when Stepan Arkadić entered.
'Oh, they were killed?' Screamed Stepan Arkadych. 'That's a good thing!
A bear?
Hello, Archipe!
He shook a man's hand and sat on a chair without taking off his coat and hats.
'Take it off, sit down! 'Take off his hat,' said Levin.
'No, I don't have time, I'm only one second,' said Stepan Arkadić.
He opened his coat, but then he took it off and sat there for an hour, talking to Levin about hunting and the most soulful objects.
'Well, please tell me, what were you doing abroad? Where have you been? 'Stepan Arkadić said, when the man came out.'
'I was in Germany, in Prussia, in France, in England, but not in capitals, but in factory cities, and I saw a lot of new things.
And I'm glad I was.
'Yes, I know your idea of a workman's device.
'Not at all: there can be no worker's question in Russia.
In Russia, it's a question of the working people's relationship to the ground; it's there, but it's a fix to the spoiled, and we have...
Stepan Arkadič listened carefully to Levin.
'Yes, yes! 'He said. 'It may well be that you are right,' he said. 'But I am glad that you are in a good spirit; and you follow the bears, and you work, and you get carried away.' 'Cause Scherbatsky told me -- he met you -- that you're in some kind of sadness, all talking about death...
'Well, I keep thinking about death,' said Levin. 'It is true that it is time to die.
And that it's all nonsense.
I'm gonna tell you the truth: I'm thinking about my work and my work, but in fact -- you think about it, because this whole world is a small mold that's sprung up on a tiny planet.
And we think we might have something great -- thought, action!
They're all grains of sand.
'This, brother, is old as the world!
'Oldly, but you know, when you understand it clearly, it's all done in a small way.
When you realize you're gonna die and nothing's gonna be left, it's nothing!
And I think it's a very important thought, and it turns out to be just as insignificant if I'd even performed it as if I had bypassed that bear.
It's how you spend your life having fun hunting, working -- just so you don't think about death.
Stepan Arkadić smiled in a subtle and sweet manner, listening to Levin.
'Of course!
So you came to me.
Remember when you attacked me for what I was looking for in a life of pleasure?
Don't be a moralist, it's so hard!
'No, there's a good thing in life...' Levin got confused. 'I don't know.
All I know is we're gonna die soon.
'Why soon?'
'And you know, the beauty of life is less when you think about death,' but calmer.
'On the contrary, it is even more fun in the wake.'
Well, I have to go, though,' said Stepan Arkadić, rising for the tenth time.
'No, sit!' said Levin, holding him. 'Now when will I see you?'
I'm going tomorrow.
'I am good!
Then I came...
Come and have lunch with me today.
Your brother will be, Karenin, my son-in-law.
'Is he here? ' said Levin, and wanted to ask about Kitty.
He heard that she was at the beginning of the winter in Petersburg with her sister, the diplomat's wife, and he didn't know if she was back or not, but thought about asking questions. "It will, it won't, it won't."
'Are you coming?'
'Of course, of course.
'It's five o'clock, and it's in a suture.
And Stepan Arkadić stood up and went down to the new boss.
Instinct did not deceive Stepan Arkadyić. The new scary boss turned out to be a very considerate man, and Stepan Arkadić had breakfast with him and sat down so that only at the fourth hour was he in contact with Alexei Alexandrovich.
When he returned from his poverty, he spent the whole morning at home.
This morning, he had two things to do: first, to accept and send to Petersburg, and now in Moscow, a delegation of foreigners; and secondly, to write the promised letter to the lawyer.
The delegation, though initiated by Alexey Alexandrovich, represented a great deal of inconvenience and even danger, and he was very pleased to have caught her in Moscow.
Members of this delegation had no idea of their role and responsibility.
They were naively convinced that it was up to them to express their needs and the true state of affairs by asking for the Government's help, and were determined not to understand that some statements and demands had supported the hostile party and had therefore ruined the whole case.
Alexei Alexandrovich worked with them for a long time, wrote them a program from which they should not have left, and by letting them go, he wrote letters to Petersburg to direct the delegation.
The chief assistant in this case was Countess Lydia Ivanovna.
She was a specialist in delegation, and no one like her knew how to muss and give real direction to delegation.
After finishing this, Alexei Alexandrovich wrote a letter to the lawyer.
He did not hesitate to allow him to act in his favor. In the letter, he added three notes from Wronsky to Anna, which were found in a stolen briefcase.
Since he left the house with the intention of not returning to his family, and since he was with a lawyer and told one person of his intention, especially since he turned this case into a paper file, he has become more and more accustomed to his intention and has now seen clearly the possibility of doing it.
He sealed the envelope to his lawyer when he heard the loud sounds of Stepan Arkadjić's voice.
Stepan Arkadič argued with Alexei Alexandrovich's servant and insisted that he be reported.
"It's all the same," he thought, "the better, I'm going to announce my position with regard to his sister and explain why I can't have lunch with him."
'Please! 'He spoke loudly, picking up the papers and putting them in the boulevard.'
'But you see that you are lying, and he is at home!' answered the voice of Stepan Arkadyich, who would not let him go, and while taking off his coat, Oblonsky entered the room. 'Well, I'm very glad I caught you!
So I hope...'" Stepan Arkadić started out fun.
'I can't be,' said Alexandrovich, cold, standing and not planting a guest.
Now he thought that he would be in a cold relationship with his wife's brother, against whom he had started a divorce; but he did not count on the sea of good - kindness that had spilled out of Stepan Arkadjić's soul.
Stepan Arkadić opened his bright, clear eyes wide.
'Why can't you?
What are you saying? I was surprised to hear him speak French. 'No, it's a promise.
And we're all counting on you.
'I mean, I can't have you, because the relationship between us has to end.
What do you mean?
Why? 'Stepan Arkadić said with a smile.'
'Cause I'm starting a divorce with your sister, my wife.
I should have...
But Alexei Alexandrovich had not yet finished his speech, as Stepan Arkadić had already done in a very different way than he had expected.
Stepan Arkadić snatched and sat in the chair.
'No, Alexis Alexandrovich, what are you saying!' cried Oblonsky, and the suffering was on his face.
'That's right.
'Excuse me, I can't and can't believe it...'
Alexey Alexandrovich sat down feeling that his words did not have the action he expected and that he would need to be explained, and that whatever his explanations were, his attitude towards his brother - in - law would remain the same.
'Yes, I am in dire need of divorce,' he said.
'I'll tell you one thing, Alexis Alexandrovich.
I know you for a great, fair man, I know Anna -- I'm sorry, I can't change my mind about her -- for a beautiful, wonderful woman, so forgive me, I can't believe it.
There was a misunderstanding,' he said.
'Yes, if it were just a misunderstanding...'
'Let me understand,' interrupted Stepan Arkadić. 'But of course... one thing: don't rush. Don't, don't hurry!
'I was not in a hurry,' said Alexis Alexandrovich coldly, 'and no one can be consulted in such a case.
I've made up my mind.
'This is awful!' said Stepan Arkadić, sighing hard. 'I would have done one thing, Alexis Alexandrovich.
I beg you, do it!' he said. 'The case has not yet begun, I understand.
Before you start the case, see my wife, talk to her.
She loves Anna like a sister, loves you, and she's an amazing woman.
For God's sake, talk to her!
Make me this friendship, I beg you!
Alexey Alexandrovich thought about it, and Stepan Arkadić looked at him with participation, without interrupting his silence.
'Are you going to see her?'
'I don't know.
That's why I wasn't at your place. I believe that our relationship must change.
'Why?
I don't see it.
Let me think that, apart from our relationship, you have for me, although in part, the friendship I have always had for you... and true respect,' said Stepan Arkadić, shaking his hand. 'If even your worst assumptions were true, I will not, and will never, judge either side and see no reason why our relationship should change.'
But now, do it, come to your wife's.
'Well, we look at this case differently,' said Alexis Alexandrovich coldly. 'But let's not talk about it.
'No, why don't you come?
Do I even have lunch today? Your wife's waiting for you.
Please come.
And most importantly, talk to her.
She's an amazing woman.
For God's sake, I beg you on my knees!
'If that is what you want -- I will come,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, sighing. And in an effort to change the conversation, he asked what was of interest to them in common -- the new commander of Stepan Arkadiyić, an old man who had suddenly received such a high appointment.
Alexey Alexandrovich had never loved Count Anichkin before, and he had always disagreed with him, but he could no longer resist a man who had been defeated in the service and who had been promoted to hate workers.
'Well, have you seen him? 'Alexei Alexandrovich said with a poisonous laugh,
'Oh, he was in our presence yesterday.
He seems to know the case well and very well.
'Yes, but what is his purpose? 'Alexei Alexandrovich said.' 'Is it to do the work, or to redo what is done?'
The misfortune of our State is a paper administration to which it is worthy of representation.
'Really, I don't know what can be condemned in it. I don't know his directions, but one thing -- he's a great guy -- said Stepan Arkadić. 'I've just been to him, and, indeed, a great fellow.
We had breakfast, and I taught him how to make, you know, drink, orange wine.
It's very chilly. And it's amazing that he didn't know that.
He really liked it.
No, really, he's a nice guy.
Stepan Arkadych took a look at the watch.
'Oh, Fathers, the fifth, and I still have to go to Longhound!
So please come and have lunch.
You can't imagine how upset you would be with my wife.
Alexei Alexandrovich did not conduct his brother-in-law the same way he met him.
'I promised, and I will come,' he replied.
'Believe me, and I hope you won't repent,' replied, smiling, Stepan Arkadić.
And when he was walking on his coat, he hit the footman's head with his hand, laughed and came out.
'At five o'clock, and in a suture, please!' he cried again, returning to the door.
It was the sixth hour, and some guests arrived when the master arrived.
He entered with Sergei Ivanovich Koznyshev and Pessov, who were at the same time at the entrance.
They were the two main representatives of Moscow's intellectuals, as they were called the Oslon.
Both people were respected by nature and mind.
They respected each other, but in almost everything they were completely and hopelessly disagreeing with each other -- not because they belonged to the opposite directions, but because there were one camp (the enemy mixed them into the same one), but in this camp they had each of their own shades.
And since there is nothing more incapable of an agreement than dissension in semi-disturbation, not only have they never come to terms, but they have long been accustomed, without anger, to laughing at the incorruptible error of one another.
They walked through the door talking about the weather when Stepan Arkadić caught up with them.
Prince Alexander Dmitrievich, father-in-law of Oblon, young Shcherbatsky, Tourovtsyn, Kitty and Karenin were sitting in the living room.
Stepan Arkadič immediately saw that the living room was going badly without him.
Daria Alexandrovna, in her gray silk dress, apparently concerned and having children to eat in the children's room alone, and because her husband is not yet there, she has not been able to make a good mix of this society without him.
Everyone sat like a guest (as the old prince put it), apparently wondering why they came here, pressing their words to keep quiet.
The good-natured Turovtsyn obviously felt out of his field, and the smile of the fat lips with which he met Stepan Arkadyich, as she said, "Well, brother, you put me with the smart ones!
Here's a drink in Chateau de fleurs -- that's my thing."
The old prince sat silently on the side looking at Karenin with his shiny eyes, and Stepan Arkadych realized that he had already invented a word to print out that state-owned husband, whose name was like a bitch.
Kitty looked at the door, gathering her strength to avoid blushing at the entrance of Constantin Levin.
Young Shcherbatsky, who had not been introduced to Karenin, tried to show that he wasn't embarrassed at all.
Karenin himself was, in Peterburg's habit, at a dinner party with ladies in a fracco and a white tie, and Stepan Arkadić, on his face, realized that he had just come to fulfill that word, and that he was doing a great job in that society.
He was the main culprit of the cold that froze all the guests before Stepan Arkadyić arrived.
When he entered the living room, Stepan Arkadić apologized, explained that he had been detained by the prince, who had always been the scavenger of all his belated and outbursts, and at one minute introduced them to Alexey Alexandrovich and Sergei Koznyshev, and gave them the theme of Poland, which they were immediately clinging to with Pestsov.
After rubbing on Turovtsyn's shoulder, he whispered something funny to him and put him in front of his wife and the prince.
Then he told Kitty that she was very good today, and introduced Scherbatsky to Karenin.
One minute he was so mixed up with all this social dough, he became a living room at least, and the voices were loud.
There wasn't one Constantin Levine.
But it was for the best, because when he went out to the dining room, Stepan Arkadych was horrified to see that the port and sherry had been taken from Depre, not from Levi, and he had ordered that the coachman be sent to Levi as soon as possible, and went back to the living room.
Konstantin Levin met him in the dining room.
'I'm not late?
'Wouldn't you be late!' said Stepan Arkadych, taking him under his arm.
'Do you have a lot of people?'
Who's who? 'Involuntarily red,' asked Levin, wearing a glove of snow from the hat.
'All yours.
Kitty's here.
Come on, I'll introduce you to Karenin.
Stepan Arkadić, despite his liberality, knew that knowing Karenin couldn't help but be flattering, so he gave it to his best mates.
But at this moment Konstantin Levin was unable to feel all the pleasure of this meeting.
He didn't see Kitty after his memorial night at which he met Vronsky, except for the minute he saw her on the big road.
He knew deep down that he would see her here today. But while maintaining his freedom of thought, he tried to assure himself that he did not know it.
But now that he heard that she was here, he suddenly felt so happy and so scared together that he had breathed, and he couldn't say what he wanted to say.
"What, what's she like?
Is it the one that was before or the one that was in the carriage?
What if the truth was told by Daria Alexandrovna?
Why isn't it true?" 'He thought.'
'Oh, please introduce me to Karenin,' he spoke with difficulty and went into the living room with a desperate and decisive move and saw her.
She wasn't what she used to be, she wasn't what she was in the carriage; she was completely different.
She was scared, shy, ashamed, and thus even more adorable.
She saw him the moment he entered the room.
She waited for him. She was happy and embarrassed from her joy to the point where there was a minute, the exact moment when he approached the mistress and looked at her again, which she and he and Dolly, who had seen everything, felt that she couldn't stand and cry.
She blushed, paled, turned red again, and froze a little bit with her lips, waiting for him.
He went up to her, bowed down, and stretched out his hand silently.
If it weren't for the light shaking of her lips and the humidity that covered her eyes and added to her glitter, her smile was almost calm when she said,
'How long has it been since we've seen each other!' And she shook her hand with desperate determination with her cold hand.
'You did not see me, but I saw you,' said Levin, smiling with a smile of happiness. 'I saw you on your way from the railway to Jergushovo.
'When? 'She asked with surprise.'
'You were going to Jergushovo,' said Levin, feeling that he was drowned by the happiness that filled his soul.
"And how dare I connect the thought of something not innocent with this moving creature!
And yes, I think it's true what Daria Alexandrovna said," he thought.
Stepan Arkadić took his hand and led him to Karenin.
'Let me introduce you. 'He has named them.
'It is very nice to meet you again,' said Alexi Alexandrovich coldly, shaking his hand to Levin.
'Do you know each other? 'Suddenly asked Stepan Arkadić.
'We spent three hours together in the car,' said Levin smiling, 'but we went out like a masquerade intrigued, at least I did.
'Please,' said Stepan Arkadić, pointing in direction to the dining room.
The men went out to the dining room and approached the table with six types of vodka and so many types of cheese with silver scapulas and no scapulas, caviars, herrings, canteens of different varieties and plates with slices of French bread.
The men stood by the smelly vodka and appetizers, and the conversation about Poland's irritation between Sergei Ivanych Koznyshev, Karenin and Pestsov quieted in anticipation of dinner.
Koznyshev, who was more than anyone able to end the most distracted and serious dispute by suddenly pouring attic salt and thus changing the mood of the interlocutors, did so now.
Aleksey Alexandrovich argued that Poland's irritation could only take place because of the higher principles to be introduced by the Russian administration.
Peskov insisted that one people assimilate another only when it is thicker.
Koznyshev acknowledged both, but with limitations.
But when they came out of the living room to make a conversation, Koznyshev said, smiling,
'There is, therefore, one way of bringing out as many children as possible.
My brother and I are the worst. And you, gentlemen, are married people, especially you, Stepan Arkadych, who act patriotically; how much do you have? 'He turned, smiling gently at the master, and giving him a tiny drink.'
Everyone laughed, and it was particularly fun for Stepan Arkadych.
'Yes, this is the best remedy!' he said, chewing cheese and pouring some special vodka into a folded glass.
The conversation really stopped at a joke.
'This cheese is not stupid. Will you order me? 'The master said.' 'Have you ever been to gymnastics again? 'He turned to Levin, touching his muscle with his left hand, and Levin smiled, drowned his hand, and rose under the fingers of Stepan Arkadiyić, like round cheese, a steel booger from under a thin skunk of a smurf.
'Here's a bicep!
Summer!
'I think it is necessary to have a great deal of power to hunt bears,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, who had the most vague notions of hunting, butchering cheese and breaking a thin one like a web, a bread flesh.
Levin smiled.
'Nothing.
On the contrary, a child can kill a bear,' he said, avoiding a light bow to the ladies who were approaching the appetizer table with the hostess.
'And you killed the bear, did you say?' 'Kiti said, trying in vain to catch with a fork an unruly, slipping mushroom and shaking laces through which her hand whitened. 'Do you have any bears?' 'She added, turning her pretty head to him and smiling.'
Nothing seemed unusual about what she said, but what an indescribable meaning for him with words was in every sound, every movement of her lips, eyes, hands when she said it!
There was a request for forgiveness, and trust in him, and tenderness, and tenderness, and a promise, and hope, and love for him, in which he could not disbelieve, and which choked him with happiness.
'No, we went to the Tver Province.
When I returned from there, I met your brother-in-law or your brother-in-law in a car," he said with a smile. 'It was a funny meeting.
And he was funny and funny to tell you how he broke into Alexei Alexandrovich's section without sleeping all night.
'The conductor, repulsively saying, wanted to walk me out of my dress; but I began to express myself with a high syllable, and... you too,' he said, forgetting his name and turning to Karenin, 'at first they wanted to banish me, too, but then they stood up, for which I am very grateful.
'In general, the very uncertain rights of passengers to choose their seats,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, rubbing his fingertips with a handkerchief.
'I have seen that you were in a state of indecision about me,' said Levin with a good smile, 'but I hastened to start a smart conversation to make up for my half-finger.
Koznyshev, while continuing his conversation with the mistress and one ear listening to his brother, touched him. "What's wrong with him today?
Such a winner,' he thought.
He did not know that Levin felt that his wings had grown.
Levin knew that she heard his words and that she was pleased to hear him. And that's the only thing that took him.
Not in this room alone, but all around the world, he was the only one of great importance and importance to himself, and she.
He felt at the height from which his head was spinning, and somewhere down there, far away, there were all these good, glorious Kareninas, the Oblons, and the whole world.
Without looking at them, but as if there was nowhere else to plant, Stepan Arkadić put Levin and Kitty next to him.
'Well, sit here at least,' he said to Levin.
Lunch was as good as the dishes that Stepan Arkadych's hunter was before.
Marie-Louise's soup was fine; the cakes were tiny, in their mouths, and they were incredible.
Two footmen and Matway, wearing white ties, did their work with food and wine in secret, quiet, and spore.
Lunch from the material side was successful; it was no less from the intangible side.
The conversation, the general conversation, the private one, did not stop, and by the end of the dinner, it was so lively that the men stood up from behind the table without stopping talking, and even Alexis Alexandrovich came to life.
Sandsov liked to reason to the end and was not satisfied with the words of Sergei Ivanovic, especially since he felt the injustice of his opinion.
'I never understood,' he said in return for the soup, referring to Alexei Alexandrovich, 'one thickness of the population, but in connection with the foundations, not with the principles.
'It seems to me that it is the same.'
In my opinion, the only person who can act on another people is the one who has higher development, who...
'But the question is,' interrupted with his bass of Pestsov, who had always been in a hurry to speak, and seemed always to count on what he was saying -- what was the idea of higher development?
English, French, Germans -- who is highly developed?
Who will nationalize one another?
We can see that Raine is French, and the Germans are not lower!-- he was screaming. 'There is another law here!
'It seems to me that influence is always on the side of true education,' said Alexis Alexandrovich, raising his eyebrows slightly.
'But what should be the sign of true education?' 'Songsov said.'